Utah statutes.
54-10a-203.   Attorney general to represent office.

(1)  The attorney general shall assign at least one attorney to the office to represent the office.

(2)  An attorney assigned to the office under Subsection (1) shall represent the office at a hearing or other proceeding affecting the services, rates, or charges of an applicable public utility.

(3)  An attorney assigned to the office may prosecute an action that the office considers necessary to enforce the rights of residential consumers and small commercial consumers of an applicable public utility.

